Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB57.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1207YC (4) 91 je/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âAccreditation Autonomy Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. Section 147A.1, subsection 13, Code 2025, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 13. âTraining programâ means an Iowa college approved by the 5 higher learning commission any federally recognized accreditor 6 of postsecondary educational institutions , an Iowa hospital 7 authorized by the department, or a medical care ambulance 8 service or nontransport service that has received authorization 9 from the department to conduct emergency medical care services 10 training. 11 Sec. 3. Section 147A.17, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 1. An Iowa college approved by the higher learning 14 commission any federally recognized accreditor of postsecondary 15 educational institutions , an Iowa hospital in this state, or 16 a medical care ambulance service or nontransport service that 17 desires to provide emergency medical care services training 18 leading to certification as an emergency medical care provider 19 shall apply to the department for authorization to establish a 20 training program. 21 Sec. 4. Section 256.183, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b, and 22 c, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 23 a. Is accredited by the higher learning commission any 24 federally recognized accreditor of postsecondary educational 25 institutions . 26 b. Is accredited by the higher learning commission any 27 federally recognized accreditor of postsecondary educational 28 institutions , is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) 29 of the Internal Revenue Code, and annually provides a matching 30 aggregate amount of institutional financial aid equal to at 31 least seventy-five percent of the amount received in a fiscal 32 year by the institutionâs students for Iowa tuition grant 33 assistance under this part . Commencing with the fiscal year 34 beginning July 1, 2006, the matching aggregate amount of 35 -1- LSB 1207YC (4) 91 je/jh 1/ 4 H.F. _____ institutional financial aid shall increase by the percentage 1 of increase each fiscal year of funds appropriated for Iowa 2 tuition grants under section 256.194, subsection 1 , to a 3 maximum match of one hundred percent. The institution shall 4 file annual reports with the commission prior to receipt of 5 tuition grant moneys under this part . An institution whose 6 income is not exempt from taxation under section 501(c) of 7 the Internal Revenue Code and whose students were eligible to 8 receive Iowa tuition grant money in the fiscal year beginning 9 July 1, 2003, shall meet the match requirements of this 10 paragraph no later than June 30, 2005. 11 c. Is a specialized college that is accredited by the higher 12 learning commission any federally recognized accreditor of 13 postsecondary educational institutions , and which offers health 14 professional programs that are affiliated with health care 15 systems located in Iowa. 16 Sec. 5. Section 260C.47, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 17 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 The state board of education shall establish an 19 accreditation process for community college programs. The 20 process shall be jointly developed and agreed upon by the 21 department of education and the community colleges. The 22 state accreditation process shall be integrated with the 23 accreditation process of the higher learning commission a 24 federally recognized accreditor of postsecondary educational 25 institutions selected by the board , including the evaluation 26 cycle, the self-study process, and the criteria for evaluation, 27 which shall incorporate the standards for community colleges 28 developed under section 260C.48 ; and shall identify and make 29 provision for the needs of the state that are not met by 30 the commissionâs accreditorâs accreditation process. The 31 department of education shall use a two-component process for 32 the continued accreditation of community college programs. 33 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 261K.1 Definitions. 34 For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise 35 -2- LSB 1207YC (4) 91 je/jh 2/ 4 H.F. _____ requires: 1 1. âAccrediting agencyâ means an entity that provides 2 accreditation of public institutions of higher education and 3 that is not a government agency. 4 2. âPublic institution of higher educationâ means an 5 institution of higher learning governed by the state board of 6 regents or a community college. 7 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 261K.2 Accrediting agencies ââ 8 adverse action against institutions for compliance with state law 9 prohibited. 10 1. An accrediting agency shall not take any adverse action 11 against a public institution of higher education for complying 12 with a state law or refusing to violate a state law. 13 2. Any adverse action taken by an accrediting agency against 14 a public institution of higher education based, in whole or 15 in part, on the institutionâs compliance with a state law or 16 refusal to violate a state law constitutes a violation of this 17 section that is subject to section 261K.3. 18 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 261K.3 Civil action. 19 A public institution of higher education that is negatively 20 affected by adverse action taken against the institution by an 21 accrediting agency in violation of section 261K.2 may bring a 22 civil action against the accrediting agency in this state if 23 authorized by the attorney general. The attorney general may 24 bring the action on behalf of the institution. The institution 25 or attorney general may obtain injunctive relief and liquidated 26 damages in the amount of the federal financial aid received by 27 the institution in the academic year preceding the violation, 28 as well as court costs and reasonable attorney fees. 29 Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 30 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 31